Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 1. General Provisions.

§79-37-101.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-102.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

[Reserved]

[Reserved]

“Approve” means, in the case of an entity, for its governors and interest holders to take whatever steps are necessary under the entity’s organic rules, organic law, and other law to:

“Conversion” means a transaction authorized by Article 4 of this chapter.

“Converted entity” means the converting entity as it continues in existence after a conversion.

“Converting entity” means the domestic entity that approves a plan of conversion pursuant to Section 79-37-403 or the foreign entity that approves a conversion pursuant to the law of its jurisdiction of formation.

“Distributional interest” means the right under an unincorporated entity’s organic law and organic rules to receive distributions from the entity.

“Domestic,” with respect to an entity, means governed as to its internal affairs by the law of this state.

“Domesticated entity” means the domesticating entity as it continues in existence after a domestication.

“Domesticating entity” means the domestic entity that approves a plan of domestication pursuant to Section 79-37-503 or the foreign entity that approves a domestication pursuant to the law of its jurisdiction of formation.

“Domestication” means a transaction authorized by Article 5 of this chapter.

“Entity”:

“Filing entity” means an entity whose formation requires the filing of a public organic record.The term does not include a limited liability partnership.

“Foreign,” with respect to an entity, means an entity governed as to its internal affairs by the law of a jurisdiction other than this state.

“Governance interest” means a right under the organic law or organic rules of an unincorporated entity, other than as a governor, agent, assignee, or proxy, to:

“Governor” means:

“Interest” means:

[Reserved]

“Interest holder‘ means:

“Interest holder liability” means:

“Jurisdiction”, used to refer to a political entity, means the United States, a state, a foreign country, or a political subdivision of a foreign country.

“Jurisdiction of formation” means the jurisdiction whose law includes the organic law of an entity.

[Reserved]

[Reserved]

“Organic law” means the law of an entity’s jurisdiction of formation governing the internal affairs of the entity.

“Organic rules” means the public organic record and private organic rules of an entity.

“Person” means an individual, business corporation, nonprofit corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, agricultural association, agricultural co-operative marketing association, statutory trust, business trust, common-law business trust, estate, trust, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Plan” means a plan of conversion or plan of domestication.

“Plan of conversion” means a plan under Section 79-37-402.

“Plan of domestication” means a plan under Section 79-37-502.

[Reserved]

[Reserved]

“Private organic rules” mean the rules, whether or not in a record, that govern the internal affairs of an entity, are binding on all of its interest holders, and are not part of its public organic record, if any.The term includes:

“Property” means all property, whether real, personal, or mixed or tangible or intangible, or any right or interest therein.

“Protected agreement” means:

“Public organic record” means the record the filing of which by the Secretary of State is required to form an entity and any amendment to or restatement of that record.The term includes:

“Record,” used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Registered foreign entity” means a foreign entity that is registered to do business in this state pursuant to a record filed by the Secretary of State.

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Statement of conversion” means a statement under Section 79-37-405.

“Statement of domestication” means a statement under Section 79-37-505.

[Reserved]

[Reserved]

[Reserved]

“Transfer” includes:

“Type of entity” means a generic form of entity:

Propose a transaction subject to this chapter;

Adopt and approve the terms and conditions of the transaction; and

Conduct any required proceedings or otherwise obtain any required votes or consents of the governors or interest holders.

Means:

A business corporation;

A nonprofit corporation;

A general partnership, including a limited liability partnership;

A limited partnership, including a limited liability limited partnership;

A limited liability company;

[Reserved];

[Reserved];

[Reserved];

A statutory trust, business trust, or common-law business trust;

An agricultural association, including an agricultural co-operative marketing association; or

Any other person that has:

A legal existence separate from any interest holder of that person; or

The power to acquire an interest in real property in its own name; and

Does not include:

An individual;

A trust with a predominantly donative purpose or a charitable trust;

An association or relationship that is not an entity listed in subparagraph (A) and is not a partnership under the rules stated in Section 79-13-202(c) or a similar provision of the law of any other jurisdiction;

A decedent’s estate; or

A government or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

Receive or demand access to information concerning, or the books and records of, the entity;

Vote for or consent to the election of the governors of the entity; or

Receive notice of or vote on or consent to an issue involving the internal affairs of the entity.

A director of a business corporation;

A director or trustee of a nonprofit corporation;

A general partner of a general partnership;

A general partner of a limited partnership;

A manager of a manager-managed limited liability company;

A member of a member-managed limited liability company;

[Reserved];

[Reserved];

[Reserved];

A trustee of a statutory trust, business trust, or common-law business trust; or

Any other person under whose authority the powers of an entity are exercised and under whose direction the activities and affairs of the entity are managed pursuant to the organic law and organic rules of the entity.

A share in a business corporation;

A membership in a nonprofit corporation;

A partnership interest in a general partnership;

A partnership interest in a limited partnership;

A membership interest in a limited liability company;

[Reserved];

[Reserved];

[Reserved];

A beneficial interest in a statutory trust, business trust, or common-law business trust;

A membership in an agricultural association, including an agricultural co-operative marketing association; or

A governance interest or distributional interest in any other type of unincorporated entity.

A shareholder of a business corporation;

A member of a nonprofit corporation;

A general partner of a general partnership;

A general partner of a limited partnership;

A limited partner of a limited partnership;

A member of a limited liability company;

[Reserved];

[Reserved];

[Reserved];

A beneficiary or beneficial owner of a statutory trust, business trust, or common-law business trust;

A member of an agricultural association, including an agricultural co-operative marketing association; or

Any other direct holder of an interest.

Personal liability for a liability of an entity that is imposed on a person:

Solely by reason of the status of the person as an interest holder; or

By the organic rules of the entity which make one or more specified interest holders or categories of interest holders liable in their capacity as interest holders for all or specified liabilities of the entity; or

An obligation of an interest holder under the organic rules of an entity to contribute to the entity.

The bylaws of a business corporation;

The bylaws of a nonprofit corporation;

The partnership agreement of a general partnership;

The partnership agreement of a limited partnership;

The operating agreement of a limited liability company;

[Reserved];

[Reserved];

[Reserved];

The bylaws of an agricultural association, including an agricultural co-operative marketing association; and

The trust instrument of a statutory trust or similar rules of a business trust or common-law business trust.

A record evidencing indebtedness and any related agreement in effect on January 1, 2015;

An agreement that is binding on an entity on January 1, 2015;

The organic rules of an entity in effect on January 1, 2015; or

An agreement that is binding on any of the governors or interest holders of an entity on January 1, 2015.

The articles of incorporation of a business corporation;

The articles of incorporation of a nonprofit corporation;

The certificate of limited partnership of a limited partnership;

The certificate of formation of a limited liability company;

[Reserved];

[Reserved];

The articles of association of an agricultural association, including an agricultural co-operative marketing association; and

The certificate of trust of a statutory trust or similar record of a business trust.

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

An assignment;

A conveyance;

A sale;

A lease;

An encumbrance, including a mortgage or security interest;

A gift; and

A transfer by operation of law.

Recognized at common law; or

Formed under an organic law, whether or not some entities formed under that law are subject to provisions of that law that create different categories of the form of entity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-103.
Relationship of chapter to other laws.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

This chapter does not authorize an act prohibited by, and does not affect the application or requirements of, law other than this chapter.

A transaction effected under this chapter may not create or impair a right, duty, or obligation of a person under the statutory law of this state relating to a change in control, takeover, business combination, control-share acquisition, or similar transaction involving a domestic converting or domesticating business corporation unless the corporation survives the transaction, the approval of the plan is by a vote of the shareholders or directors which would be sufficient to create or impair the right, duty, or obligation directly under the law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 3, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-104.
Required notice or approval.

A domestic or foreign entity that is required to give notice to, or obtain the approval of, a governmental agency or officer of this state to be a party to a merger must give the notice or obtain the approval to be a party to a conversion or domestication.

Property held for a charitable purpose under the law of this state by a domestic or foreign entity immediately before a transaction under this chapter becomes effective may not, as a result of the transaction, be diverted from the objects for which it was donated, granted, devised, or otherwise transferred unless, to the extent required by or pursuant to the law of this state concerning cy pres or other law dealing with nondiversion of charitable assets, the entity obtains an appropriate order of the appropriate court specifying the disposition of the property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 4, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-105.
Status of filings.

A filing under this chapter signed by a domestic entity becomes part of the public organic record of the entity if the entity’s organic law provides that similar filings under that law become part of the public organic record of the entity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 5, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-106.
Nonexclusivity.

The fact that a transactionunder this chapter produces a certain result does not preclude the same result from being accomplished in any other manner permitted by law other than this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 6, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-107.
Reference to external facts.

A plan may refer to facts ascertainable outside the plan if the manner in which the facts will operate upon the plan is specified in the plan.The facts may include the occurrence of an event or a determination or action by a person, whether or not the event, determination, or action is within the control of a party to the transaction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 7, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-108.
Alternative means of approval of transactions.

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of a domestic entity, approval of a transaction under this chapter by the affirmative vote or consent of all its interest holders satisfies the requirements of this chapter for approval of the transaction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 8, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-109.
Appraisal rights.

An interest holder of a domestic converting or domesticating entity is entitled to appraisal rights in connection with the transaction if the interest holder would have been entitled to appraisal rights under the entity’s organic law in connection with a merger in which the interest of the interest holder was changed, converted, or exchanged unless:

The organic law permits the organic rules to limit the availability of appraisal rights; and

The organic rules provide such a limit or elimination.

The case of a business corporation, by action of its governors.

An interest holder of a domestic converting or domesticating entity is entitled to contractual appraisal rights in connection with a transaction under this chapter to the extent provided in:

The entity’s organic rules;

The plan; or

If an interest holder is entitled to contractual appraisal rights under subsection (b) and the entity’s organic law does not provide procedures for the conduct of an appraisal rights proceeding, Article 13 of the Mississippi Business Corporation Act applies to the extent practicable or as otherwise provided in the entity’s organic rules or the plan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 9, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

Pursuant to
Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected an error in a statutory reference in (c) by substituting “Article 13 of the Mississippi Business Corporation Act” for “Chapter 13 of the Mississippi Business Corporation Act.” The Joint Committee ratified the correction at its July 24, 2014, meeting.

§79-37-110.
[Reserved].

[Reserved for future codification purposes.]

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 10, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-111.
Requirements for documents.

To be entitled to filing by the Secretary of State, a document must satisfy the following requirements and the requirements of any other provision of this chapter that adds to or varies these requirements:

This chapter requires or permits filing the document in the Office of the Secretary of State.

The document contains the information required by this chapter and may contain other information.

The document is in a record.

The document is in the English language, but the name of an entity need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals.

The document is signed:

The document must state the name and capacity of the person that signed it.

The document must be delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing in the format and in the manner required by the Secretary of State.

By an officer or director of a domestic or foreign corporation;

By a person authorized by a domestic or foreign entity that is not a corporation; or

If the entity is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

When a document is delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing, the correct filing fee must be paid or provision for payment made in a manner permitted by the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 11; Laws, 2017, ch. 308, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment, in (a), inserted “or director” in (5)(A), and added “in the format and in the manner required by the Secretary of State” at the end of (7).

§79-37-112.
Filing, service, and copying fees.

The Secretary of State shall collect a fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) each time process is served on the Secretary of State under this chapter. The party to a proceeding causing service of process may recover this fee as costs if the party prevails in the proceeding.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees for copying and certifying the copy of any document filed under this chapter:

One Dollar ($1.00) a page for copying; and

Ten Dollars ($10.00) for the certificate.

[Reserved]

[Reserved]

Statement of conversion. . . . .$50.00

Statement of abandonment of conversion. . . . .$25.00

Statement of domestication. . . . .$50.00

Statement of abandonment of domestication. . . . .$25.00

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when the documents described are delivered for filing:

[Reserved]

[Reserved]

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 12, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-113.
Effective time and date of document.

Except as provided in Section 79-37-114, a document accepted for filing is effective:

At the date and time of filing, as evidenced by the means used by the Secretary of State for recording the date and time of filing;

At the time specified in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed;

At a specified delayed effective time and date if permitted by this chapter; or

If a delayed effective date but no time is specified, at the close of business on the date specified.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 13, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-114.
Correcting filed document.

A domestic or foreign entity may correct a document filed by the Secretary of State within one hundred twenty (120) days of the filing if:

The document contains an inaccuracy;

The document was defectively signed; or

The electronic transmission of the document to the Secretary of State was defective.

A document is corrected by filing with the Secretary of State a statement of correction that:

Describes the document to be corrected and states its filing date or has attached a copy of the document;

Specifies the inaccuracy or defect to be corrected; and

Corrects the inaccuracy or defect.

A statement of correction is effective on the effective date of the document it corrects except as to persons relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the correction.As to those persons, a statement of correction is effective when filed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 14; Laws, 2017, ch. 308, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment substituted “within one hundred twenty (120) days” for “within sixty (60) days” in the introductory paragraph of (a).

§79-37-115.
Filing duty of Secretary of State.

A document delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing that satisfies the requirements of Section 79-37-111 must be filed by the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State files a document by recording it as filed on the date and time of receipt.After filing a document, the Secretary of State shall deliver to the domestic or foreign entity or its representative a copy of the document with an acknowledgement of the date and time of filing.

If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document, the Secretary of State shall return the document to the domestic or foreign entity or its representative within five (5) days after the document was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for the refusal.

The duty of the Secretary of State to file documents under this section is ministerial.The filing or refusal to file a document does not:

Affect the validity or invalidity of the document in whole or in part;

Relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document; or

Create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 15, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-116.
Appeal from refusal to file a document.

If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document delivered for filing, the domestic or foreign entity that submitted the document for filing may appeal the refusal within thirty (30) days after the return of the document to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.The appeal is commenced by petitioning the court to compel filing the document and by attaching to the petition the document and the explanation of the Secretary of State for the refusal to file.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to file the document or take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 16; Laws, 2017, ch. 308, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment rewrote the first sentence of (a), which read: “If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document delivered for filing, the domestic or foreign entity that submitted the document for filing may appeal the refusal within thirty (30) days after the return of the document to the chancery court of the county where the entity’s principal office is or will be located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the entity does not have a principal office in this state.”

§79-37-117.
Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.

A filed-stamped copy from the Secretary of State conclusively establishes that the original document is on file with the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 17, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-118.
Penalty for signing false document.

A person commits an offense if he signs a document he knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 18, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-119.
Powers of Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required by this chapter and adopt rules and regulations for enforcement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 19, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.